Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-152
Interstate compact; discretionary provisions.

A compact entered into pursuant to sections 43-147 to 43-154 may contain provisions in addition to those required pursuant to section 43-151, including:

(1) Provisions establishing procedures and entitlements to medical, developmental, child care, or other social services for the child in accordance with applicable laws even though the child and the adoptive parents are in a state other than the one responsible for or providing the services or the funds to defray part or all of the costs thereof; and

(2) Such other provisions as may be appropriate or incidental to the proper administration of the compact.

Laws 1985, LB 447, § 6.